Illinois, session 104th, SB2696.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Eminent Domain Act is amended by adding 5Section 25-5-140 as follows: 6    (735 ILCS 30/25-5-140 new)7    Sec. 25-5-140. Quick-take; Village of Hoffman Estates. 8Quick-take proceedings under Article 20 may be used for a 9period of one year after the effective date of this amendatory 10Act of the 104th General Assembly by the Village of Hoffman 11Estates for the acquisition of the following described 12property for the purpose of constructing improvements on 13portions of Shoe Factory Road from Essex Drive to Beverly 14Road, along with portions of Beverly Road and Rohrssen Road 15connecting to Shoe Factory Road. 16    Route: Shoe Factory Road Cook17    Section:18    County: Cook19    Job No.:20    Parcel: 000521    Sta.: 129+93.32 To Sta. 136+47.6122    Sta.: 1133+69.43 To Sta. 1149+91.23  SB2696 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 14542 LNS 27683 b1    Owner: Beverly/Beacon, LLC, an Illinois limited liability 2    company3    Index No.: 06-05-401-0014        That part of Lot 4 in Laufenburger Subdivision, being 5    a subdivision of part of Fractional Section 5 and the 6    Northeast Quarter of Section 8, all in Township 41 North, 7    Range 9 East of the Third Principal Meridian, according to 8    the plat thereof recorded December 18, 2006 as document 9    number 0635216073 and corrected by certificate of 10    correction recorded October 15, 2013 as document number 11    1328819060, in Cook County, Illinois, described as 12    follows:13        Beginning at the southwest corner of said Lot 4; 14    thence on an Illinois Coordinate System NAD 83(2011) East 15    Zone bearing of North 14 degrees 50 minutes 41 seconds 16    West along a westerly line of said Lot 4, a distance of 17    8.40 feet; thence northeasterly 858.43 feet along a curve 18    to the left having a radius of 1329.42 feet, the chord of 19    said curve bears North 56 degrees 19 minutes 41 seconds 20    East, 843.59 feet to a point of tangency; thence North 37 21    degrees 49 minutes 47 seconds East, a distance of 387.85 22    feet; thence North 38 degrees 58 minutes 32 seconds East, 23    a distance of 150.03 feet; thence North 37 degrees 49 24    minutes 47 seconds East, a distance of 127.68 feet to a 25    point of curvature; thence northeasterly 131.29 feet along 26    a curve to the left having a radius of 200.00 feet, the   SB2696 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 14542 LNS 27683 b1    chord of said curve bears North 19 degrees 01 minute 26 2    seconds East, 128.94 feet to a point of tangency, being 3    11.58 feet normally distant West of the east line of said 4    Lot 4; thence North 0 degrees 13 minutes 04 seconds East 5    along a line 11.58 feet normally distant West of and 6    parallel with the east line of said Lot 4, a distance of 7    310.56 feet to a point of curvature; thence northerly 8    345.91 feet along a curve to the right having a radius of 9    8066.58 feet, the chord of said curve bears North 1 degree 10    26 minutes 47 seconds East, 345.89 feet to an easterly 11    line of said Lot 4; thence South 3 degrees 42 minutes 58 12    seconds East along an easterly line of said Lot 4, a 13    distance of 60.70 feet to the east line of Lot 4; thence 14    South 0 degrees 13 minutes 04 seconds West along the east 15    line of said Lot 4, a distance of 679.85 feet (679.65 feet, 16    recorded) to the southeasterly line of Lot 4; thence 17    southwesterly 76.39 feet (76.71 feet, recorded) along the 18    southeasterly line of said Lot 4 on a curve to the left 19    having a radius of 1127.04 feet, the chord of said curve 20    bears South 39 degrees 53 minutes 31 seconds West, 76.38 21    feet to a point of tangency on said southeasterly line; 22    thence South 37 degrees 57 minutes 00 seconds West along 23    the southeasterly line of said Lot 4, a distance of 699.81 24    feet to a point of curvature on said southeasterly line; 25    thence southwesterly 65.45 feet (65.44 feet, recorded) 26    along the southeasterly line of said Lot 4 on a curve to   SB2696 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 14542 LNS 27683 b1    the right having a radius of 562.50 feet, the chord of said 2    curve bears South 41 degrees 17 minutes 00 seconds West, 3    65.41 feet to a point of compound curvature on said 4    southeasterly line; thence southwesterly 752.74 feet along 5    the southeasterly line of said Lot 4 on a curve to the 6    right having a radius of 1450.00 feet, the chord of said 7    curve bears South 59 degrees 29 minutes 18 seconds West, 8    744.32 feet to the point of beginning.9        Said parcel containing 0.711 acre, more or less. 10    Route: Shoe Factory Road11    Section:12    County: Cook13    Job No.:14    Parcel: 0005P.E.15    Sta.: 129+93.32 To Sta. 139+77.0916    Sta.: 1133+69.48 To Sta. 1149+50.0017    Owner: Beverly/Beacon, LLC, an Illinois limited liability 18    company19    Index No.: 06-05-401-00120        That part of Lot 4 in Laufenburger Subdivision, being 21    a subdivision of part of Fractional Section 5 and the 22    Northeast Quarter of Section 8, all in Township 41 North, 23    Range 9 East of the Third Principal Meridian, according to 24    the plat thereof recorded December 18, 2006 as document 25    number 0635216073 and corrected by certificate of   SB2696 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 14542 LNS 27683 b1    correction recorded October 15, 2013 as document number 2    1328819060, in Cook County, Illinois, described as 3    follows:4        Commencing at the southwest corner of said Lot 4; 5    thence on an Illinois Coordinate System NAD 83(2011) East 6    Zone bearing of North 14 degrees 50 minutes 41 seconds 7    West along a westerly line of said Lot 4, a distance of 8    8.40 feet to the point of beginning; thence northeasterly 9    858.43 feet along a curve to the left having a radius of 10    1329.42 feet, the chord of said curve bears North 56 11    degrees 19 minutes 41 seconds East, 843.59 feet to a point 12    of tangency; thence North 37 degrees 49 minutes 47 seconds 13    East, a distance of 387.85 feet; thence North 38 degrees 14    58 minutes 32 seconds East, a distance of 150.03 feet; 15    thence North 37 degrees 49 minutes 47 seconds East, a 16    distance of 127.68 feet to a point of curvature; thence 17    northeasterly 131.29 feet along a curve to the left having 18    a radius of 200.00 feet, the chord of said curve bears 19    North 19 degrees 01 minute 26 seconds East, 128.94 feet to 20    a point of tangency, being 11.58 feet normally distant 21    West of the east line of said Lot 4; thence North 0 degrees 22    13 minutes 04 seconds East along a line 11.58 feet 23    normally distant West of and parallel with the east line 24    of said Lot 4, a distance of 310.56 feet to a point of 25    curvature; thence northerly 345.91 feet along a curve to 26    the right having a radius of 8066.58 feet, the chord of   SB2696 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 14542 LNS 27683 b1    said curve bears North 1 degree 26 minutes 47 seconds 2    East, 345.89 feet to an easterly line of said Lot 4; thence 3    North 3 degrees 42 minutes 58 seconds West along an 4    easterly line of said Lot 4, a distance of 245.41 feet to 5    an angle point on said easterly line; thence North 5 6    degrees 05 minutes 46 seconds West along an easterly line 7    of said Lot 4, a distance of 78.73 feet; thence southerly 8    157.86 feet along a curve to the right having a radius of 9    2121.00 feet, the chord of said curve bears South 0 10    degrees 02 minutes 13 seconds East, 157.82 feet to a point 11    of tangency; thence South 2 degrees 05 minutes 42 seconds 12    West, a distance of 246.17 feet to a point of curvature; 13    thence southerly 265.22 feet along a curve to the left 14    having a radius of 8095.00 feet, the chord of said curve 15    bears South 1 degree 09 minutes 24 seconds West, 265.21 16    feet to a point of tangency, being 40.00 feet normally 17    distant West of the east line of said Lot 4; thence South 0 18    degrees 13 minutes 04 seconds East along a line 40.00 feet 19    normally distant West of and parallel with the east line 20    of said Lot 4, a distance of 18.88 feet; thence South 89 21    degrees 46 minutes 56 seconds East, a distance of 16.42 22    feet to a point 23.58 feet normally distant West of the 23    east line of said Lot 4; thence South 0 degrees 13 minutes 24    04 seconds West along a line 23.58 feet normally distant 25    West of and parallel with the east line of said Lot 4, a 26    distance of 285.00 feet; thence South 15 degrees 07   SB2696 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 14542 LNS 27683 b1    minutes 18 seconds West, a distance of 106.59 feet; thence 2    South 37 degrees 49 minutes 47 seconds West, a distance of 3    149.24 feet; thence South 38 degrees 58 minutes 32 seconds 4    West, a distance of 150.03 feet; thence South 37 degrees 5    49 minutes 47 seconds West, a distance of 20.66 feet; 6    thence North 52 degrees 10 minutes 13 seconds West, a 7    distance of 42.78 feet; thence South 37 degrees 49 minutes 8    47 seconds West, a distance of 20.00 feet; thence South 52 9    degrees 10 minutes 13 seconds East, a distance of 42.78 10    feet; thence South 37 degrees 49 minutes 47 seconds West, 11    a distance of 135.00 feet; thence South 52 degrees 10 12    minutes 13 seconds East, a distance of 4.00 feet; thence 13    South 37 degrees 49 minutes 47 seconds West, a distance of 14    212.32 feet to a point of curvature; thence southwesterly 15    159.05 feet along a curve to the right having a radius of 16    1319.42 feet, the chord of said curve bears South 41 17    degrees 16 minutes 59 seconds West, 158.95 feet; thence 18    North 45 degrees 15 minutes 49 seconds West along a radial 19    line, a distance of 14.00 feet; thence southwesterly 20    516.16 feet along a curve to the right having a radius of 21    1305.42 feet, the chord of said curve bears South 56 22    degrees 03 minutes 49 seconds West, 512.81 feet; thence 23    South 22 degrees 36 minutes 32 seconds East along the 24    prolongation of a radial line, a distance of 8.00 feet; 25    thence westerly 170.36 feet along a curve to the right 26    having a radius of 1313.42 feet, the chord of said curve   SB2696 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 14542 LNS 27683 b1    bears South 71 degrees 06 minutes 24 seconds West, 170.24 2    feet to a westerly line of said Lot 4; thence South 14 3    degrees 50 minutes 41 seconds East along a westerly line 4    of said Lot 4, a distance of 16.00 feet to the point of 5    beginning.6        Said permanent easement containing 1.066 acres, more 7    or less.8        Said permanent easement to be used for grading, 9    drainage and public utility purposes. 10    Route: Shoe Factory Road11    Section:12    County: Cook13    Job No.:14    Parcel: 0005T.E.-A15    Sta. 1145+54.93 To Sta. 1146+73.3116    Owner: Beverly/Beacon, LLC, an Illinois limited liability 17    company18    Index No.: 06-05-401-00119        That part of Lot 4 in Laufenburger Subdivision, being 20    a subdivision of part of Fractional Section 5 and the 21    Northeast Quarter of Section 8, all in Township 41 North, 22    Range 9 East of the Third Principal Meridian, according to 23    the plat thereof recorded December 18, 2006 as document 24    number 0635216073 and corrected by certificate of 25    correction recorded October 15, 2013 as document number   SB2696 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 14542 LNS 27683 b1    1328819060, in Cook County, Illinois, described as 2    follows:3        Commencing at the southwest corner of said Lot 4; 4    thence on an Illinois Coordinate System NAD 83(2011) East 5    Zone bearing of North 14 degrees 50 minutes 41 seconds 6    West along a westerly line of said Lot 4, a distance of 7    8.40 feet; thence northeasterly 858.43 feet along a curve 8    to the left having a radius of 1329.42 feet, the chord of 9    said curve bears North 56 degrees 19 minutes 41 seconds 10    East, 843.59 feet to a point of tangency; thence North 37 11    degrees 49 minutes 47 seconds East, a distance of 387.85 12    feet; thence North 38 degrees 58 minutes 32 seconds East, 13    a distance of 150.03 feet; thence North 37 degrees 49 14    minutes 47 seconds East, a distance of 127.68 feet to a 15    point of curvature; thence northeasterly 131.29 feet along 16    a curve to the left having a radius of 200.00 feet, the 17    chord of said curve bears North 19 degrees 01 minute 26 18    seconds East, 128.94 feet to a point of tangency, being 19    11.58 feet normally distant West of the east line of said 20    Lot 4; thence North 0 degrees 13 minutes 04 seconds East 21    along a line 11.58 feet normally distant West of and 22    parallel with the east line of said Lot 4, a distance of 23    310.56 feet to a point of curvature; thence northerly 24    345.91 feet along a curve to the right having a radius of 25    8066.58 feet, the chord of said curve bears North 1 degree 26    26 minutes 47 seconds East, 345.89 feet to an easterly   SB2696 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 14542 LNS 27683 b1    line of said Lot 4; thence North 3 degrees 42 minutes 58 2    seconds West along an easterly line of said Lot 4, a 3    distance of 245.41 feet to an angle point on said easterly 4    line; thence North 5 degrees 05 minutes 46 seconds West 5    along an easterly line of said Lot 4, a distance of 78.73 6    feet; thence southerly 157.86 feet along a curve to the 7    right having a radius of 2121.00 feet, the chord of said 8    curve bears South 0 degrees 02 minutes 13 seconds East, 9    157.82 feet to a point of tangency; thence South 2 degrees 10    05 minutes 42 seconds West, a distance of 246.17 feet to a 11    point of curvature; thence southerly 265.22 feet along a 12    curve to the left having a radius of 8095.00 feet, the 13    chord of said curve bears South 1 degree 09 minutes 24 14    seconds West, 265.21 feet to a point of tangency, being 15    40.00 feet normally distant West of the east line of said 16    Lot 4; thence South 0 degrees 13 minutes 04 seconds East 17    along a line 40.00 feet normally distant West of and 18    parallel with the east line of said Lot 4, a distance of 19    18.88 feet; thence South 89 degrees 46 minutes 56 seconds 20    East, a distance of 16.42 feet to a point 23.58 feet 21    normally distant West of the east line of said Lot 4; 22    thence South 0 degrees 13 minutes 04 seconds West along a 23    line 23.58 feet normally distant West of and parallel with 24    the east line of said Lot 4, a distance of 285.00 feet; 25    thence South 15 degrees 07 minutes 18 seconds West, a 26    distance of 106.59 feet; thence South 37 degrees 49   SB2696 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 14542 LNS 27683 b1    minutes 47 seconds West, a distance of 149.24 feet; thence 2    South 38 degrees 58 minutes 32 seconds West, a distance of 3    132.38 feet to the point of beginning; thence continuing 4    South 38 degrees 58 minutes 32 seconds West, a distance of 5    17.65 feet; thence South 37 degrees 49 minutes 47 seconds 6    West, a distance of 20.66 feet; thence North 52 degrees 10 7    minutes 13 seconds West, a distance of 42.78 feet; thence 8    South 37 degrees 49 minutes 47 seconds West, a distance of 9    20.00 feet; thence South 52 degrees 10 minutes 13 seconds 10    East, a distance of 42.78 feet; thence South 37 degrees 49 11    minutes 47 seconds West, a distance of 37.14 feet; thence 12    North 57 degrees 29 minutes 40 seconds West, a distance of 13    247.15 feet; thence North 46 degrees 56 minutes 58 seconds 14    West, a distance of 221.87 feet; thence North 48 degrees 15    20 minutes 03 seconds East, 70.00 feet; thence South 48 16    degrees 27 minutes 10 seconds East, a distance of 82.40 17    feet; thence South 57 minutes 29 minutes 40 seconds East, 18    a distance of 374.00 feet to the point of beginning.19        Said temporary easement containing 0.906 acres, more 20    or less. Said temporary easement to be used for grading 21    purposes. 22    Route: Shoe Factory Road23    Section:24    County: Cook25    Job No.:  SB2696 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 14542 LNS 27683 b1    Parcel: 0005T.E.-B2    Sta.: 133+40.89 To Sta. 134+71.173    Owner: Beverly/Beacon, LLC, an Illinois limited liability 4    company5    Index No.: 06-05-401-0016        That part of Lot 4 in Laufenburger Subdivision, being 7    a subdivision of part of Fractional Section 5 and the 8    Northeast Quarter of Section 8, all in Township 41 North, 9    Range 9 East of the Third Principal Meridian, according to 10    the plat thereof recorded December 18, 2006 as document 11    number 0635216073 and corrected by certificate of 12    correction recorded October 15, 2013 as document number 13    1328819060, in Cook County, Illinois, described as 14    follows:15        Commencing at the southwest corner of said Lot 4; 16    thence on an Illinois Coordinate System NAD 83(2011) East 17    Zone bearing of North 14 degrees 50 minutes 41 seconds 18    West along a westerly line of said Lot 4, a distance of 19    8.40 feet; thence northeasterly 858.43 feet along a curve 20    to the left having a radius of 1329.42 feet, the chord of 21    said curve bears North 56 degrees 19 minutes 41 seconds 22    East, 843.59 feet to a point of tangency; thence North 37 23    degrees 49 minutes 47 seconds East, a distance of 387.85 24    feet; thence North 38 degrees 58 minutes 32 seconds East, 25    a distance of 150.03 feet; thence North 37 degrees 49 26    minutes 47 seconds East, a distance of 127.68 feet to a   SB2696 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 14542 LNS 27683 b1    point of curvature; thence northeasterly 131.29 feet along 2    a curve to the left having a radius of 200.00 feet, the 3    chord of said curve bears North 19 degrees 01 minute 26 4    seconds East, 128.94 feet to a point of tangency, being 5    11.58 feet normally distant West of the east line of said 6    Lot 4; thence North 0 degrees 13 minutes 04 seconds East 7    along a line 11.58 feet normally distant West of and 8    parallel with the east line of said Lot 4, a distance of 9    310.56 feet to a point of curvature; thence northerly 10    345.91 feet along a curve to the right having a radius of 11    8066.58 feet, the chord of said curve bears North 1 degree 12    26 minutes 47 seconds East, 345.89 feet to an easterly 13    line of said Lot 4; thence North 3 degrees 42 minutes 58 14    seconds West along an easterly line of said Lot 4, a 15    distance of 245.41 feet to an angle point on said easterly 16    line; thence North 5 degrees 05 minutes 46 seconds West 17    along an easterly line of said Lot 4, a distance of 78.73 18    feet; thence southerly 157.86 feet along a curve to the 19    right having a radius of 2121.00 feet, the chord of said 20    curve bears South 0 degrees 02 minutes 13 seconds East, 21    157.82 feet to a point of tangency; thence South 2 degrees 22    05 minutes 42 seconds West, a distance of 246.17 feet to a 23    point of curvature; thence southerly 166.76 feet along a 24    curve to the left having a radius of 8095.00 feet, the 25    chord of said curve bears South 1 degree 30 minutes 18 26    seconds West, 166.76 feet to the point of beginning;   SB2696 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 14542 LNS 27683 b1    thence North 78 degrees 50 minutes 56 seconds West, a 2    distance of 240.47 feet; thence North 74 degrees 05 3    minutes 14 seconds West, a distance of 120.47 feet; thence 4    South 11 degrees 06 minutes 19 seconds West, a distance of 5    130.00 feet; thence North 74 degrees 34 minutes 37 seconds 6    East, a distance of 134.12 feet; thence South 78 degrees 7    50 minutes 56 seconds East, 251.53 feet; thence northerly 8    61.01 feet along a curve to the right having a radius of 9    8095.00 feet, the chord of said curve bears North 0 10    degrees 41 minutes 56 seconds East, 61.01 feet to the 11    point of beginning.12        Said temporary easement containing 0.601 acre, more or 13    less.14        Said temporary easement to be used for grading 15    purposes. 16    (b) This Section is repealed 2 years after the effective 17date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.